noun-vep-morph.txt
LEXICON NOUN-QAQ ! Stem vowel alternation ZERO-A-ZERO
:QAQ1 NOUN ;

LEXICON NOUN-QAO 
:QAO1 NOUN ;

LEXICON NOUN-EH
:EH1 NOUN ;

LEXICON NOUN-QEQ
:QEQ1 NOUN ;

LEXICON NOUN-INE
:INE1 NOUN ;

LEXICON NOUN-ZD_QEQ
:ZD1 NOUN ;

LEXICON NOUN-ZS_QEQ
:ZS1 NOUN ;

LEXICON NOUN
+N: SGNOMSUF ;
+N: SGGENSUF ;
+N: SGPARTSUF ;
+N: SGILLSUF ;
+N: SGADESUF ;

+N: PLNOMSUF ;
+N: PLGENSUF ;
+N: PLPARTSUF ;
+N: PLILLSUF ;
+N: PLADESUF ;


LEXICON SGNOMSUF
+Sg+Nom: K ;

LEXICON SGGENSUF
+Sg+Gen:%>n K ;

LEXICON SGACCSUF
+Sg+Acc:%>n K ;

LEXICON SGPARTSUF
+Sg+Part:%>d K ; ! d/t

LEXICON SGTRASUF
+Sg+Tra:%>ks K ;

LEXICON SGABESUF
+Sg+Abe:%>ta K ;

LEXICON SGCOMSUF
+Sg+Com:%>nke K ;

LEXICON SGINESUF
+Sg+Ine:%>s K ; ! s/š kül’betiš 

LEXICON SGELASUF
+Sg+Ela:%>späi K ; ! späi/špäi 

LEXICON SGILLSUF
+Sg+Ill:%>hV1 K ; ! o-ho

LEXICON SGADESUF
+Sg+Ade:%>l K ;

LEXICON SGABlSUF
+Sg+Abl:%>lpäi K ;

LEXICON SGALLSUF
+Sg+All:%>le K ;

LEXICON SGESSSUF ! Essive-instructive
+Sg+Ess:%>n K ;

LEXICON SGPRLSUF
+Sg+Prl:%>dme K ;

LEXICON SGAPR1SUF
+Sg+Apr1:%>nno K ;

LEXICON SGAPR2SUF
+Sg+Apr2:%>nnoks K ;

LEXICON SGEGRSUF
+Sg+Egr:%>nnopäi K ;

LEXICON SGTER1SUF
+Sg+Ter1:%>hV1sai K ;

LEXICON SGTER2SUF
+Sg+Ter2:%>lesai K ;

LEXICON SGADI1SUF
+Sg+Adi1:%>hV1päi K ;

LEXICON SGADI2SUF
+Sg+Adi2:%>lepäi K ;






!! Start Plural
LEXICON SGNOMSUF
+Pl+Nom:%>d K ;

LEXICON SGGENSUF
+Pl+Gen:%>iden K ;

LEXICON SGACCSUF
+Pl+Acc:%>d K ;

LEXICON SGPARTSUF
+Pl+Part:%>id K ; ! d/t

LEXICON SGTRASUF
+Pl+Tra:%>ikš K ;

LEXICON SGABESUF
+Pl+Abe:%>ita K ;

LEXICON SGCOMSUF
+Pl+Com:%>idenke K ;

LEXICON SGINESUF
+Pl+Ine:%>iš K ; ! s/š kül’betiš 

LEXICON SGELASUF
+Pl+Ela:%>išpäi K ; ! späi/špäi 

LEXICON SGILLSUF
+Pl+Ill:%>ihe K ; ! o-ho

LEXICON SGADESUF
+Pl+Ade:%>il K ;

LEXICON SGABlSUF
+Pl+Abl:%>ilpäi K ;

LEXICON SGALLSUF
+Pl+All:%>ile K ;

LEXICON SGESSSUF ! Essive-instructive
+Pl+Ess:%>in K ;

LEXICON SGPRLSUF
+Pl+Prl:%>idme K ;

LEXICON SGAPR1SUF
+Pl+Apr1:%>idenno K ;

LEXICON SGAPR2SUF
+Pl+Apr2:%>idennoks K ;

LEXICON SGEGRSUF
+Pl+Egr:%>idennopäi K ;

LEXICON SGTER1SUF
+Pl+Ter1:%>ihesai K ;

LEXICON SGTER2SUF
+Pl+Ter2:%>ilesai K ;

LEXICON SGADI1SUF
+Pl+Adi1:%>ihepäi K ;

LEXICON SGADI2SUF
+Pl+Adi2:%>ilepäi K ;





!! Possessor Indices
